Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-690
Act, how cited.

Sections 46-675 to 46-690 shall be known and may be cited as the Industrial Ground Water Regulatory Act.

Laws 1981, LB 56, § 16;

Laws 1986, LB 309, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 789, § 10;

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 79.